Utah statutes.
4-23-7.5.   Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention Account.
(1)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the
Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention Account.
(2)  Money received under Section 4-23-7 shall be deposited by the
commissioner of agriculture and food in the Agricultural and Wildlife Damage
Prevention Account to be appropriated for the purposes provided in this
chapter.
(3)  Any supplemental contributions received by the department from livestock
owners for predator control programs shall be deposited into the Agricultural
and Wildlife Damage Prevention Account.
(4)  The Division of Finance shall deposit contributions and interest
remaining on June 30, 2009 in the Wolf Depredation and Management Restricted
Account created in Section 23-14-14.1 into the Agricultural and Wildlife
Damage Prevention Account to be appropriated for the purposes provided in this
chapter.
